Florida, session 2026, SB798.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSection 30.10, Florida Statutes, is amended to 11 read: 12 30.10âPlace of office.âThe place of office of every sheriff 13 may shall be at any location within the county lines seat of the 14 county. 15 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.